Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202479-2,145
Rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education, based on the recommendations of the state school security director appointed pursuant to section 79-2,143, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing minimum school security standards on or before July 1, 2016. Any rules or regulations that create a training requirement shall ensure that such training requirement shall be reasonable in length.

Laws 2014, LB923, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 23.
July 19, 2024